California statutes. Unemployment Insurance Code
(a) For purposes of this division (and so much of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as relates to this division) any supplemental unemployment compensation benefit paid to an individual shall be treated as if it were a payment of wages by an employer to an employee for a payroll period.

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), “supplemental unemployment
 compensation benefits” means amounts which are paid to an employee, pursuant to a plan to which the employer is a party, because of an employee’s involuntary separation from employment (whether or not that separation is temporary), resulting directly from a reduction in force, the discontinuance of a plant or operation, or other similar conditions, but only to the extent those benefits are includable in the employee’s gross income.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 72.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

13028.6.

(a) For purposes of this division (and so much of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as relates to this division), any payment to an individual of sick pay which does not constitute wages (determined without regard to this subdivision), if at the time the payment is made a request that such sick pay be subject to withholding under this division is in effect, shall be treated as if it were a payment of wages by an
 employer to an employee for a payroll period.

(b) For purposes of this subdivision, “sick pay” means any amount which satisfies both of the following:

(1) Is paid to an employee pursuant to a plan to which the employer is a party.

(2) Constitutes remuneration or a payment in lieu of remuneration for any period during which the employee is temporarily absent from work on account of sickness or personal injuries.

(c) If a payee makes a request that any sick pay be subject to withholding under this chapter, the amount to be deducted and withheld under this chapter from any payment to which that request applies shall be an amount (not less than a minimum amount determined by the Franchise Tax Board) specified by the payee in that request. The amount
 deducted and withheld with respect to a payment which is greater or less than a full payment shall bear the same relation to the specified amount as that payment bears to a full payment.

(1) A request that any sick pay be subject to withholding under this chapter shall satisfy all of the following:

(A) Shall be made by the payee in writing to the person making the payments and shall contain the social security number of the payee.

(B) Shall specify the amount to be deducted and withheld from each full payment.

(C) Shall take effect with respect to payments made more than seven days after the date on which that request is furnished to the payer, or as the department shall by regulations prescribe. That request may be changed or terminated by furnishing
 to the person making the payments a written statement of change or termination which shall take effect in the same manner as provided in the preceding sentence. At the election of the payer, any such request (or statement of change or revocation) may take effect earlier than as provided in this subparagraph.

(2) Any sick pay paid pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between employee representatives and one or more employers which contains a provision specifying that this paragraph is to apply to sick pay paid pursuant to that agreement and contains a provision for determining the amount to be deducted and withheld from each payment of that sick pay as follows:

(A) The requirement of paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) that a request for withholding be in effect shall not apply.

(B) Except as provided in Section
 13026, the amounts to be deducted and withheld under this chapter shall be determined in accordance with that agreement.

The preceding sentence shall not apply with respect to sick pay paid pursuant to any agreement to any individual, unless the social security number of that individual is furnished to the payer and the payer is furnished with that information as is necessary to determine whether the payment is pursuant to the agreement and to determine the amount to be deducted and withheld.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 73.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

13029.

The department may by authorized regulations provide for withholding— 
 (a) From remuneration for services performed by an employee for his or her employer which (without regard to this section) does not constitute wages, and 
 (b) From any other type of payment with respect to which the department finds that withholding would be appropriate under the provisions of this division, 
if the employer and the employee, or in the case of any other type of payment the person making and the person receiving the payment, agree to the withholding. The agreement shall be made in the form and manner as the department may by authorized regulations provide. For purposes of this division (and so much of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 10.2 (commencing with Section 18401) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code as relates to this division) remuneration or other payments with respect to which the agreement is made shall be treated as if they were wages paid by an employer to an employee to the extent that the remuneration is paid or other payments are made during the period for which the agreement is in effect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 74.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

13030.

If wages are paid with respect to a period which is not a payroll period, the amount to be deducted and withheld shall be that applicable in the case of a miscellaneous payroll period containing a number of days, including Sundays and holidays, equal to the number of days in the period with respect to which such wages are paid. In any case in which wages are paid by an employer without regard to any payroll period or other period, the amount to be deducted and withheld shall be that applicable in the case of a miscellaneous payroll period containing a number of days equal to the number of days, including Sundays and holidays, which have elapsed since the
 date of the last payment of such wages by such employer during the calendar year, or the date of commencement of employment with such employer during such year, or January 1st of such year, whichever is the later. In any case in which the period of time described, or the time prescribed in the preceding sentence in respect of any wages, is less than one week, the department may by authorized regulation permit an employer, in computing the tax required to be deducted and withheld, to use the excess of the aggregate of the wages paid to the employee during the calendar week over the withholding exemption allowed by Section 13020 for a weekly payroll period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13031.

If the remuneration paid by an employer to an employee for services performed during one-half or more of any payroll period of not more than 31 consecutive days constitutes wages, all the remuneration paid by such employer to such employee for such period shall be deemed to be wages, but if the remuneration paid by an employer to an employee for services performed during more than one-half of any such payroll period does not constitute wages, then none of the remuneration paid by such employer to such employee for such period shall be deemed to be wages.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Withholding Exemptions [13040. - 13043.]

13040.

(a) An employer shall use the exemption certificate filed by the employee with the employer in such form and containing such information as the department may prescribe, for determining the number of withholding exemptions to be allowed in computing the tax required to be deducted and withheld under Section 13020. However, if the employer cannot determine the employee’s marital status from the exemption certificate the employee shall be considered unmarried.

(b) No withholding exemptions shall be allowed until the employee files a new withholding exemption certificate if the department finds that the withholding exemption certificate filed under this division does not properly reflect the number of exemptions allowable and so advises the employer in writing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13041.

The number and amount of withholding exemptions allowed shall be based upon the persons claimed in a withholding exemption certificate in effect under Section 13040, except that if no such certificate is in effect, the number of withholding exemptions claimed shall be considered to be zero.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13042.

A new withholding exemption certificate filed under this division in cases in which a previous certificate was in effect shall take effect with respect to the first payment of wages made on or after the first status determination date which occurs at least 30 days from the date on which such certificate is so furnished, except that at the election of the employer such certificate may be made effective with respect to any payment of wages made on or after the date on which such certificate is so furnished.

For purposes of this section, “status determination date,” means January 1, May 1, July 1, and October 1, of each year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13043.

(a) The amount to be deducted and withheld under this division shall be prescribed pursuant to Section 18663 of the Revenue and Taxation Code when a payment of wages is made to an employee by an employer in any of the following cases:

(1) With respect to a payroll period or other period, any part of which is included in a payroll period or other period with respect to which wages are also paid to the employee by the employer.

(2) Without regard to any payroll period or other period, but on or prior to the expiration of a payroll period or other period with respect to which wages are also paid to the employee by the employer.

(3) With respect to a period beginning in one and ending in another calendar year.

(4) Through an agent, fiduciary, or other person who also has the control, receipt, custody, or disposal of, or pays, the wages payable by another employer to the employee.

(b) For purposes of this section, an employee’s remuneration may consist of wages paid for a payroll period and supplemental wages.

Supplemental wages include, but are not limited to, bonus payments, overtime payments, commissions, sales awards, back pay including retroactive wage increases, and reimbursements for nondeductible moving expenses that are paid for the same or different period, or without regard to a particular period.

(c) When any supplemental wages are paid subsequent to the payment of regular wages, the employer may determine the personal income tax to be withheld from supplemental wages paid by (1) using a flat percentage rate pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 18663 of the Revenue and Taxation Code without allowance for exemptions and credits and without reference to any regular payment of wages, or (2) adding the supplemental wages to the regular wages paid the employee and computing the personal income tax to be withheld on the whole amount (the computed tax minus the tax withheld from the regular wages shall be withheld from the supplemental wages). Where supplemental wages are paid at the same time as regular wages, the personal income tax to be withheld shall be computed on the total of the supplemental and regular wages and shall be determined as if the total of the supplemental wages and the regular wages constituted a single wage payment for the regular payroll period.

(d) For stock options and bonus payments that constitute wages paid on or after January 1, 2002, the employer may determine the personal income tax to be withheld from the stock options and bonus payments paid by either (1) using a flat percentage rate pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 18663 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, without allowance for exemptions and credits and without reference to any regular payment of wages, or (2) adding the stock options and bonus payments to the regular wages paid the employee and computing the personal income tax to be withheld on the whole amount (the computed tax minus the tax withheld from the regular wages shall be withheld from the stock options and bonus payments). Where the stock options and bonus payments are paid at the same time as regular wages, the personal income tax to be withheld shall be computed on the total of the stock options and bonus payments and regular wages, and shall be determined as if the total of the stock options and bonus payments and the regular wages constituted a single wage payment for the regular payroll period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 488, Sec. 13.   Effective September 12, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Reports, Returns, and Statements [13050. - 13059.]

13050.

(a) Every employer or person required to deduct and withhold from an employee a tax under Section 986, 3260, or 13020, or who would have been required to deduct and withhold a tax under Section 13020 (determined without regard to Section 13025) if the employee had claimed no more than one withholding exemption, shall furnish to each employee in respect of the remuneration paid by the person to the employee during the calendar year, on or before January 31 of the succeeding year, or, if his or her employment is terminated before the close of the calendar year, on the day on which the last payment of remuneration is made, a written statement showing all of the following:

(1) The name
 of the person.

(2) The name of the employee, and his or her social security or identifying number if wages have been paid.

(3) The total amount of wages subject to personal income tax, as defined by Section 13009.5.

(4) The total amount deducted and withheld as tax under Section 13020.

(5) The total amount of worker contributions paid by the employee pursuant to Section 986.

(6) The total amount of worker contributions paid by the employee pursuant to Section 3260.

(7) The total amount of elective deferrals (within the meaning of Section 402(g)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code) and compensation deferred pursuant to Section 457
 of the Internal Revenue Code.

(b) The statement required to be furnished pursuant to this section in respect of any remuneration shall be furnished at other times, shall contain other information, and shall be in a form, as the department may by authorized regulations prescribe.

(c) If, during any calendar year, any person makes a payment of third-party sick pay to an employee, that person shall, on or before January 15 of the succeeding year, furnish a written statement to the employer in respect of whom the payment was made showing all of the following:

(1) The name and, if there is withholding under this division, the social security number of that employee.

(2) The total amount of the third-party sick pay paid to that employee during the calendar
 year.

(3) The total amount, if any, deducted and withheld from that sick pay under this division. For purposes of the preceding sentence, the term “third-party sick pay” means any sick pay, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 13028.6, which does not constitute wages for purposes of this division, determined without regard to subdivision (a) of Section 13028.6.

(A) For purposes of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 2101) of Part 1 of Division 1, the statements required to be furnished by this subdivision shall be treated as statements required under this section to be furnished to employees.

(B) Every employer who receives a statement under this subdivision with respect to sick pay paid to any employee during any calendar year shall, on or before January 31 of the succeeding year, furnish a written statement to
 that employee showing all of the information shown on the statement furnished under this subdivision.

(d) The Franchise Tax Board shall be allowed access to the information filed with the department pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 63.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

13052.

Any person or employer required under Section 13050 to furnish a statement to an employee who furnishes a false or fraudulent statement, or who fails to furnish a statement in the manner, at the time, and showing the information required under Section 13050, or regulations prescribed thereunder, shall for each such failure, unless due to reasonable cause, pay a penalty of fifty dollars ($50). The penalty shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as the tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13052.5.

(a) In addition to the penalty imposed by Section 19183 of the Revenue and Taxation Code (relating to failure to file information returns), if any person, or entity fails to report amounts paid as remuneration for personal services as required under Section 13050 of this code or Section 6041A of the Internal Revenue Code on the date prescribed thereof (determined with regard to any extension of time for filing), that person or entity may be liable for a penalty determined under subdivision (b).

(b) For purposes of subdivision (a), the amount determined under this subdivision is the maximum rate under Section 17041 of the Revenue and Taxation Code multiplied by the unreported amounts paid as remuneration for personal
 services.

(c) The penalty imposed by subdivision (a) shall be assessed against that person or entity required to file a return under Section 13050 of this code or Section 6041A of the Internal Revenue Code.

(d) The penalty imposed under this section shall be in lieu of the penalty imposed under Section 19175 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. In the event that a
 penalty is imposed under both this section and Section 19175 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, only the penalty imposed under this section shall apply.

(e) The penalty imposed by this section may be assessed in lieu of, or in addition to, the penalty imposed by Section 13052 with respect to the failure to furnish a withholding statement to an employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 117, Sec. 11.   (AB 1695)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

13055.

Every employee who, in the course of his or her employment by an employer, receives in any calendar month tips which are wages shall report all such tips in one or more written statements furnished to his or her employer on or before the 10th day following such month. Such statements shall be furnished by the employee under such authorized regulations, at such other times before such 10th day, and in such form and manner as may be prescribed by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13056.

(a) When required by authorized regulations prescribed by the department:

(1) Any person or employer required under the authority of this division to make a return, report, statement, or other document shall include in the return, report, statement, or other document the identifying number as may be prescribed for securing proper identification of the person.

(2) Any person with respect to whom a return, report, statement, or other document is required under the authority of this division to be made by another person shall furnish to the other person the identifying number as may be prescribed for securing his or her proper identification.

(3) Any person or employer required under the authority of this division to make a return, report, statement, or other document with respect to another person shall request from the other person, and shall include in the return, report, statement, or other document, the identifying number as may be prescribed for securing proper identification of the other person.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), a return or report of any person with respect to his or her liability for tax, or any statement or other document in support thereof, shall not be considered for purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) as a return, report, statement, or other document with respect to another person.

(2) For purposes of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a), a return or report of an estate or trust with respect to its liability for tax, and any statement or other document in support thereof, shall be considered as a return, report, statement, or other document with respect to each beneficiary of the estate or trust.

(c) For purposes of this section, the department is authorized to require the information that may be necessary to assign an identifying number to any person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 31.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13057.

(a) If any person who is required by regulations prescribed under Section 13056 to provide a required identifying number fails without good cause to comply with that requirement at the time prescribed by the regulations, the person shall pay a penalty of five dollars ($5) for each failure:

(1) To include his or her identifying number in any return, report, statement, or other document.

(2) To furnish his or her identifying number to another person.

(3) To include in any return, report, statement, or other document made with respect to another person the identifying number of the other person.

(4) To furnish any other agency’s taxpayer identification number.

(b) The penalty under this section shall be assessed and collected in the same manner as the tax.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13058.

Except as otherwise provided by the department, any return, report, statement, or other document required to be made under any provision of this division or authorized regulations shall contain, or be verified by, a written declaration that it is made under the penalty of perjury. The returns, reports, and all other returns, reports, statements, or other documents or copies thereof required by this division, shall be in the form as the department may from time to time prescribe, and shall be filed with the department. The department shall prepare blank forms for the returns, reports, declarations, statements, or other documents and shall distribute them throughout the state and furnish them upon application. Failure to receive or secure the form does not relieve any employer or person from making any return, report, statement, or other document required.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1049, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

13059.

If the Governor declares a state of emergency, the director may extend the time requirements for filing returns, reports, and statements required by this chapter. The extension granted by the director pursuant to this section shall only apply to employers prevented by the conditions giving rise to the state of emergency from timely filing their returns, reports, and statements of wages or timely payment of the taxes due.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 402, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Collections [13070. - 13077.]

13070.

(a) The employer shall be liable for the payment of the tax required to be deducted and withheld under Section 13020, and shall not be liable to any person for the amount of such payment.

(b) Whenever any employer or person has withheld any amount pursuant to this division, the amount so withheld shall be held to be a special fund in trust for the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13071.

If the employer, in violation of the provisions of this division, fails to deduct and withhold the tax under this division, and thereafter the tax against which the tax may be credited is paid or the taxpayer reports to the Franchise Tax Board the wages or gross income against which the tax would have been imposed, the tax so required to be deducted and withheld shall not be collected from the employer, but this section shall in no case relieve the employer from liability for any penalties or additions to the tax otherwise applicable with respect to the failure to deduct and withhold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 402, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

13072.

The department may by notice, served personally or by first-class mail, require any employer, person, officer or department of the state, political subdivision or agency of the state, including the Regents of the University of California, a city organized under a freeholders’ charter, or a political body not a subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession, or under their control, any credits or other personal property or other things of value, belonging to a taxpayer or to an employer or person who has failed to withhold and transmit amounts due pursuant to Section 13070 or 13073 to withhold, from such credits or other personal property or other things of value, the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from the taxpayer or the amount of any liability incurred by such employer or person for failure to withhold and transmit amounts due from a taxpayer and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at such times as it may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13073.

Any employer or person failing to withhold the amount due from any taxpayer and to transmit the same to the department after service of a notice pursuant to Section 13072 is liable for such amounts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13074.

Any employer or person required to withhold and transmit any amount pursuant to this division shall comply with the requirement without resort to any legal or equitable action in a court of law or equity. Any employer or person paying to the department any amount required by it to be withheld is not liable therefor to the person from whom withheld unless the amount withheld is refunded to the withholding agent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13075.

Whenever, under any provision of this division, service is authorized upon the state of any notice to withhold, unless expressly exempted from the provisions of this section, such service to be effective must, in addition to any other requirements, be made on the state agency owing the obligation prior to the time such agency presents the claim for payment thereof to the State Controller.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13076.

If the employer is the United States, or this state, or any political subdivision thereof, including the Regents of the University of California, a city organized under a freeholders’ charter, or any agency or instrumentality of any one or more of the foregoing, the return of the amount deducted and withheld upon any wages may be made by any officer or employee of the United States, or of such state, city organized under a freeholders’ charter, or political subdivision, or of such agency or instrumentality, as the case may be, having control of the payment of such wages, or appropriately designated for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------

13077.

(a) For purposes of Sections 13020 and 13070, if a lender, surety, or other person, who is not an employer under such sections with respect to an employee or group of employees, pays wages directly to such an employee or group of employees, employed by one or more employers, or to an agent on behalf of such employee or employees, such lender, surety, or other person shall be liable in his or her own person and estate to the State of California in a sum equal to the taxes (together with interest) required to be deducted and withheld from such wages by such employer.

(b) If a lender, surety, or other person supplies funds to or for the account of an employer for the specific purpose of paying wages of the employees of such employer, with actual notice or knowledge that such employer does not intend to or will not be able to make timely payment or deposit of the amounts of tax required by this part to be deducted and withheld by such employer from such wages, such lender, surety, or other person shall be liable in his or her own person and estate to the State of California in a sum equal to the taxes (together with interest) which are not paid over to the State of California by such employer with respect to such wages. However, the liability of such lender, surety, or other person shall be limited to an amount equal to 25 percent of the amount so supplied to or for the account of such employer for such purpose.

(c) Any amounts paid to the State of California pursuant to this section shall be credited against the liability of the employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1007, Sec. 64.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 67 of Ch. 1007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Violations [13101. - 13101.]

13101.

(a) In addition to any criminal penalty provided by law, if any individual makes a statement under Section 13040, 13041, or 13042 which results in a decrease in the amounts deducted and withheld under this division, and as of the time the statement was made, there was no reasonable basis for the statement, the individual shall pay a penalty of five hundred dollars ($500) for the statement.

(b) The department may waive, in whole or in part, the penalty imposed under subdivision (a) if the taxes imposed with respect to the individual under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code for the taxable year are equal to or less than the sum of both of the following:

(1) The credits against those taxes allowed by Sections 17052.1 through 17053.7 and Section 19002.

(2) The payments of estimated tax which are considered payments on account of those taxes.

(c) Article 11 (commencing with Section 1221) of Chapter 4 of Part 1, relating to administrative appellate review, shall not apply to the assessment or collection of any penalty imposed by subdivision (a).

(d) This section shall apply to acts and failures to act after December 31, 1981.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 77.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 7. CALIFORNIA WORKFORCE INNOVATION AND OPPORTUNITY ACT [14000. - 14531.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [14000. - 14004.5.]

14000.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that, in order for California to remain prosperous and globally competitive, it needs to have a well-educated and highly skilled workforce.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that the following principles shall guide the state’s workforce investment system:

(1) Workforce investment programs and services shall be responsive to the needs of employers, workers, and students by accomplishing the following:

(A) Preparing California’s students and workers with the skills necessary to successfully compete in the global economy.

(B) Producing greater numbers of individuals who obtain industry-recognized certificates and career-oriented degrees in competitive and emerging industry sectors and filling critical labor market skills gaps.

(C) Adapting to rapidly changing local and regional labor markets as specific workforce skill requirements change over time.

(D) Preparing workers for good-paying jobs that foster economic security and upward mobility.

(E) Aligning employment programs, resources, and planning efforts regionally around industry sectors that drive regional employment to connect services and training directly to jobs. 

(2) State and local workforce development boards are encouraged to collaborate with other public and private institutions, including businesses, unions, nonprofit organizations, kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, career technical education programs, adult career technical education and basic skills programs, apprenticeships, community college career technical education and basic skills programs, entrepreneurship training programs, where appropriate, the California Community Colleges Economic and Workforce Development Program, the Employment Training Panel, and county-based social and employment services, to better align resources across
 workforce, training, education, and social service delivery systems and build a well-articulated workforce investment system by accomplishing the following:

(A) Adopting local and regional training and education strategies which include workplace-based earn and learn programs that build on the strengths and fill the gaps in the education and workforce development pipeline in order to address the needs of job seekers, workers, and employers within regional labor markets by supporting sector strategies.

(B) Leveraging resources across education and workforce training delivery systems to build career pathways and fill critical skills gaps.

(3) Workforce investment programs and services shall be data driven
 and evidence based when setting priorities, investing resources, and adopting practices.

(4) Workforce investment programs and services shall develop strong partnerships with the private sector, ensuring industry involvement in needs assessment, planning, and program evaluation.

(A) Workforce investment programs and services shall encourage industry involvement by developing strong partnerships with an industry’s employers and the unions that represent the industry’s workers.

(B) Workforce investment programs and services may consider the needs of employers and businesses of all sizes, including large, medium, small, and microenterprises, when setting priorities, investing resources, and adopting practices.

(5) Workforce investment programs and services shall be outcome oriented and accountable, measuring results for program participants, including, but not limited to, outcomes related to program completion, employment, and earnings.

(6) Programs and services shall be accessible to employers, the self-employed, workers, and students who may benefit from their operation, including individuals with employment barriers, such as persons with economic, physical, or other barriers to employment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 507, Sec. 1.5.   (SB 342)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that screening designed to detect unidentified disabilities, including learning disabilities, improves workforce preparation and enhances the use of employment and training resources.

(b) Section 134(c)(2) of the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act (29 U.S.C. Sec. 3174(c)(2)) allows for the use of funds for initial assessment of skill levels, aptitudes, abilities, and support services, including, when appropriate, comprehensive and specialized assessments of skill levels and service needs, including, but not limited to, diagnostic testing and the use of other assessment tools and in-depth interviewing and evaluation to identify
 employment barriers and appropriate employment goals.

(c) The Legislature encourages one-stop career centers to maximize the use of Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act resources and other federal and state workforce development resources for screening designed to detect unidentified disabilities, and if indicated, appropriate diagnostic assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 5.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14003.

(a) Grants or contracts awarded under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, codified in Chapter 32 (commencing with Section 3101) of Title 29 of the United States Code, or any other state or federally funded workforce development program, may not be awarded to organizations that are owned or operated as pervasively sectarian organizations.

(b) Grants or contracts awarded under the federal Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act, codified in Chapter 32 (commencing with Section 3101) of Title 29 of the United States Code, or any other state or federally funded workforce development program, shall comply with Section 4 of Article I and Section 5 of Article XVI of the
 California Constitution, state and federal civil rights laws, and the First Amendment to the United States Constitution in regard to pervasively sectarian organizations. These legal constraints include prohibitions on the discrimination against beneficiaries and staff based on protected categories and on the promoting of religious doctrine to advance sectarian beliefs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 94, Sec. 6.   (AB 1270)   Effective January 1, 2016.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.

To be eligible for state or federal workforce development funds awarded by the state under the California Community and Faith Based Initiative, an organization must be a separate nonprofit entity or affiliate that is a tax-exempt organization under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 225, Sec. 23.1.   Effective August 11, 2003.   See conditional termination clause in Section 14007.)
-------------------------------------------

14004.5.
